Hawaii statutes.
§269-145.5 Advanced grid modernization
technology; principles. (a) The commission, in carrying out its
responsibilities under this chapter, shall consider the value of improving
electrical generation, transmission, and distribution systems and infrastructure
within the State through the use of advanced grid modernization technology in
order to improve the overall reliability and operational efficiency of the
Hawaii electric system.

(b) In advancing the public interest, the
commission shall balance technical, economic, environmental, and cultural
considerations associated with modernization of the electric grid, based on
principles that include but are not limited to:

(1) Enabling a diverse portfolio of renewable energy
resources;

(2) Expanding options for customers to manage their
energy use;

(3) Maximizing interconnection of distributed
generation to the State's electric grids on a cost-effective basis at
non-discriminatory terms and at just and reasonable rates, while maintaining
the reliability of the State's electric grids, and allowing such access and
rates through applicable rules, orders, and tariffs as reviewed and approved by
the commission;

(4) Determining fair compensation for electric grid
services and other benefits provided to customers and for electric grid
services and other benefits provided by distributed generation customers and
other non-utility service providers; and

(5) Maintaining or enhancing grid reliability and
safety through modernization of the State's electric grids. [L 2013, c 34, §2;
am L 2014, c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next